Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.170.050

Advisory committee—Members—Duties.

The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint a substance abuse advisory committee comprised of: Representatives of certificated and classified staff; administrators; parents; students; school directors; the bureau of alcohol and substance abuse within the department of social and health services; the traffic safety commission; and county coordinators of alcohol and drug treatment. The committee shall advise the superintendent on matters of local program development, coordination, and evaluation.

[ 1997 c 13 s 3; 1987 c 518 s 209. Formerly RCW 28A.120.038.]

NOTES:

Intent—1994 c 166; 1987 c 518: See note following RCW 43.216.525.

Severability—1987 c 518: See note following RCW 43.216.525.